Tennessee, session 114, SB1983.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-2701(a)(1)(C), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead the following:
(C) The redemption period is determined for each parcel based on the period of
delinquency. Once the period of delinquency is established, the redemption period must
be set on the following scale:
(i) If the period of delinquency is three (3) years or less, the redemption
period is one (1) year from the entry of the order confirming the sale; or
(ii) If the period of delinquency is more than three (3) years, the
redemption period is ninety (90) days from the entry of the order confirming the
sale.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to entries of orders confirming a tax sale of a parcel subject to redemption occurring on
or after that date.
SB1983
011473
- 1 -